errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON NUBBEGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON NUBBENJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON NUBBEVIDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#viđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#viđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#viđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON NUBBEGUDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#guđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#guđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#guđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:i%>n#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
nubbe#goalmmát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
nubbe#njealját#lohkái:nubb NUBBENJEALJATLOHKAI ;
nubbe#viđát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEVIDATLOHKAI ;
nubbe#guđát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEGUDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
nubbe#goalmmát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
nubbe#njealját#lohkái:nubb NUBBENJEALJATLOHKAI ;
nubbe#viđát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEVIDATLOHKAI ;
nubbe#guđát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEGUDATLOHKAI ;
